Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 30

Radio Common Carriers

65-30-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the “State Radio Common Carrier Act.”

Acts 1972, ch. 641, § 1; T.C.A., § 65-3001.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Service Commissions, § 6.

65-30-102. Declaration of public policy.

Upon investigation, the general assembly has determined that the rates, services and operations of radio common carriers are affected with a public interest, and it is hereby declared to be the policy of this state to provide fair regulation of such carriers in the interest of the public, to promote adequate, economical and efficient radio common carrier service to citizens and residents of this state; to provide just and reasonable rates and charges for radio common carrier services without unjust discrimination, undue preferences or advantages, or unfair or destructive competitive practices; to encourage and promote harmony between radio common carriers and their subscribers; to cooperate with other states and with the federal government in promoting and coordinating efforts to effectively regulate radio common carriers in the public interest; and to these ends, to vest authority in the Tennessee public utility commission to regulate radio common carriers generally and their rates, services and operations, in the manner and in accordance with the policies set forth in this chapter. This chapter shall not apply to operations of radio or television broadcast stations licensed and regulated by the federal communications commission.

Acts 1972, ch. 641, § 2; T.C.A., § 65-3002; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 40; 2017, ch. 94, § 63.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-30-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commission” means the Tennessee public utility commission;

“Radio common carrier” and “carrier” includes any person, firm, corporation, company, association or partnership owning, operating or managing a business of providing radio services to the public on a for-hire basis and under such circumstances as would require a license by the federal communications commission as a miscellaneous common carrier in the domestic public land mobile radio service; provided, that such definition does not include land line telephone or telegraph utilities regulated by the commission or to community antenna television systems; and

“Radio common carrier system” means any facility within this state which is operated to perform for hire the service of radio communications to members of the public who subscribe to such service; and “facility,” as used in this subsection (3), includes all real property, stations, antennae, radios, receivers, transmitters, instruments, appliances, fixtures and other personal property used by a radio common carrier in providing service to its subscribers.

Acts 1972, ch. 641, § 3; T.C.A., § 65-3003; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 40; 2017, ch. 94, § 63.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted the definition of “commission” for the definition of “authority” and substituted “commission” for “authority” twice in the definition of “radio common carrier”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-30-104. Applicability of chapter.

This chapter relates only to “radio common carriers” as defined in § 65-30-103 and shall not apply to mobile radio telephone service offered by land line telephone or telegraph utilities regulated by the commission.

This chapter shall not apply to operations of radio or television broadcast stations licensed and regulated by the federal communications commission.

Acts 1972, ch. 641, § 5; T.C.A., § 65-3005; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 40; 2017, ch. 94, § 63.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Cross-References. Applicability of section, § 65-4-113.

65-30-105. Certificate of public convenience and necessity.

No person or organization shall hereafter begin the construction, extension or operation of a radio common carrier system or acquire ownership or control thereof, without first obtaining from the commission a certificate that the present or future public convenience and necessity require or will require such construction, extension, operation or acquisition.

The application for such a certificate of public convenience and necessity shall be in writing, shall include a description of the territory in which the radio common carrier system is proposed to be constructed, extended, operated or acquired, and shall contain such other information as the commission may prescribe from time to time by rules and regulations or orders, including any and all information as to who will own an interest of any kind in the radio common carrier system, and shall be accompanied by a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00).

Such applicant shall disclose and file with the commission any and all information relating to ownership and control required to be filed with the federal communications commission.

Upon the filing of such an application and the payment of the fee prescribed, the commission shall fix the time and place for a hearing thereon and shall cause notice thereof to be given to the holder of an existing certificate in the affected territory, and to the chief executive officer of any government entity within the affected territory, and to such other parties in interest as the commission may deem necessary. In the event the applicant proposes to interconnect its radio common carrier system with the communications system of an existing land line telephone or telegraph company, then notice of such hearing and a copy of the application shall be served upon the telephone or telegraph utility. If the application is to extend a certificated carrier's operations into a territory contiguous to that of the territory then being actively served by such carrier, and which territory is not then being served by an existing carrier, upon the showing of the need for such service in the contiguous area, such certificated carrier shall be given the preference to serve such contiguous area.

After such hearing, the commission may issue to the applicant a certificate of public convenience and necessity in a form to be prescribed by it or may refuse to issue the same or may issue it for only partial exercise of the privilege sought, or may attach to the exercise of the right granted by the certificate such terms, limitations and conditions which it deems the public interest may require. The certificate shall include a description of the territory in which the radio common carrier system is to be constructed, extended, operated or acquired.

In determining whether a certificate shall be issued, the commission shall take into consideration, among other things, the public need for the proposed service or acquisition, the suitability of the applicant, the financial responsibility of the applicant, the ability of the applicant to perform efficiently the service for which authority is requested.

The commission shall not grant a certificate for a proposed radio common carrier operation or extension thereof into the established service area which will be in competition with or duplication of any other certificated radio common carrier unless it shall first determine that the existing service is inadequate to meet the reasonable needs of the public and that the person, firm or corporation operating the same is unable to or refuses or neglects after hearing on reasonable notice to provide reasonably adequate service.

It is a legislative finding that to provide adequate service, including meaningful competition in any service area where qualified applicants have applied for a certificate of public convenience and necessity, the commission shall grant certificates of public convenience and necessity to a total of two (2) radio common carriers in each such service area, and that such number of service providers will provide the highest level of overall service to the public.

An applicant who is granted a certificate of public convenience and necessity by the commission shall apply for and seek appropriate authority from the federal communications commission, and in the event the applicant fails to do so within six (6) months from the date of grant of authority by the commission, the applicant shall be deemed to have abandoned its application to operate as a radio common carrier.

If an applicant, after obtaining a certificate of convenience and necessity from the commission, and after obtaining appropriate authority also from the federal communications commission, fails to commence operations as a radio common carrier within twelve (12) months from the date it has obtained the appropriate federal authority, the applicant shall be deemed to have abandoned its intention to operate as a radio common carrier. For good cause shown, this twelve-month period may be extended for another like period.

The granting of any certificate of convenience and necessity to a radio common carrier shall not alter or diminish the right of any land line telephone company rendering communications services in the same area to provide the same or similar radio services within the area specified in the certificate.

The commission may, after affording the holder an opportunity to be heard, revoke, suspend or alter any such certificate of public convenience and necessity for the willful violation of any provision of this chapter or the rules and regulations or orders of the commission made under the authority of this chapter.

Acts 1972, ch. 641, §§ 4, 7; T.C.A., §§ 65-3004, 65-3007; Acts 1991, ch. 343, § 1; 1995, ch. 305, § 40; 2017, ch. 94, § 63.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Cross-References. Applicability of section, § 65-4-113.

65-30-106. General jurisdiction of commission.

The commission has the power and jurisdiction to supervise and regulate every radio common carrier operating within this state and its property, property rights, equipment, facilities, contracts, certificates and franchises so far as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, and to do all things, whether specifically designated in this chapter or in addition thereto, which are necessary or convenient in the exercise of such power and jurisdiction. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the commission is authorized to adopt and enforce such reasonable rules and regulations and orders as it may deem necessary with respect to rates, charges and classifications, issuance of certificates, territory of operation, abandonment, suspension, or failure to offer service, adequacy of service prevention or elimination of unjust discrimination between subscribers, financial responsibility, insurance covering personal injury and property damage, uniform system of accounts, records, reports, safety of operation and equipment, and to otherwise accomplish the purposes of this chapter and to implement its provisions.

The commission may, after affording an opportunity for hearing, order a radio common carrier to:

Construct and operate any reasonable extension of its existing system within the certificated territory; or

Make any reasonable repair or improvement of or addition to such system.

The commission may from time to time visit the places of business and other premises and examine the records, and facilities of all radio common carriers to ascertain if there has been compliance with all rules and regulations and orders of the commission, and shall have the power to examine all officers, agents and employees of such radio common carriers, and all other persons, under oath, and to compel the production of papers and the attendance of witnesses to obtain the information necessary for administering this chapter.

The commission has the power and authority to institute all proceedings and investigations, hear all complaints, issue all process and orders, and render all decisions necessary to enforce this chapter or of the rules, regulations and orders adopted thereunder, or to otherwise accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

With respect to borderline jurisdiction between this state and adjacent state jurisdictions, the 37 dBu contour of any base station located in this state and operated from the base station in the state is construed to mean that area within thirty-five (35) miles of the state base station. The commission shall have full power and authority to negotiate with other state commissions in an effort to determine and work out the conflict, if any, between base stations in this state and the base stations certificated and located in other adjoining states.

The commission has the right to institute, or to intervene as a party in, any action in any court of competent jurisdiction seeking mandamus, injunctive or other relief to compel compliance with this chapter or of any rule, regulation or order adopted thereunder, or to restrain or otherwise prevent or prohibit any illegal or unauthorized conduct in connection with this chapter.

Acts 1972, ch. 641, § 8; T.C.A., § 65-3008; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 40; 2017, ch. 94, § 63.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-30-107. Rates.

The commission shall prescribe just and reasonable rates, charges and classifications for the services rendered by a radio common carrier to subscribers. Tariffs shall be in such form and filed and published in such manner and on such notice as the commission may prescribe.

Acts 1972, ch. 641, § 9; T.C.A., § 65-3009; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 40; 2017, ch. 94, § 63.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” twice.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-30-108. Duties of radio common carriers.

Each radio common carrier shall provide safe and adequate service, equipment and facilities for the operation of its system.

No radio common carrier shall demand or receive a greater or less or different compensation for providing service than the rates and charges specified in the tariff filed and approved by the commission.

Every radio common carrier shall obey and comply with every rule and regulation and order adopted by the commission under this chapter.

Acts 1972, ch. 641, § 10; T.C.A., § 65-3010; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 40; 2017, ch. 94, § 63.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” in (b) and (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-30-109. Abandonment.

No radio common carrier shall abandon all or any part of its system or other property necessary or useful in the performance of its duties to the public, or discontinue or temporarily suspend all or any part of the service which it is rendering to the public by the use of same, without first obtaining the approval of the commission. In granting such approval, the commission may impose such terms, conditions or requirements as in its judgment are necessary to protect the public interest.

Acts 1972, ch. 641, § 11; T.C.A., § 65-3011; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 40; 2017, ch. 94, § 63.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-30-110. Interconnection with land line telephone utility.

Whenever the commission finds that public convenience and necessity require the interconnection of the radio communications facilities of a certificated radio common carrier with the telephone facilities of a land line telephone utility serving all or part of the certificated territory of the radio common carrier, and that such common carrier and land line telephone utility have failed to agree upon such interconnection or the terms and conditions or compensation for the same, the commission may, upon petition of either party, order that such interconnection be permitted, and prescribe a reasonable compensation and reasonable terms and conditions for such interconnection.

Acts 1972, ch. 641, § 12; T.C.A., § 65-3012; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 40; 2017, ch. 94, § 63.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-30-111. Supervision and regulation.

The supervision, control and regulation of public utilities are provided for under chapter 4 of this title and these provisions, and specifically, chapter 4, part 3 of this title, shall apply to radio common carriers.

Acts 1972, ch. 641, § 13; T.C.A., § 65-3013.

65-30-112. Penalty.

Any person or the officer, agent or employee of any organization who willfully violates any provisions of this chapter or of any rule, regulation or order adopted thereunder, or who willfully procures, aids or abets any violation of such a provision, commits a Class C misdemeanor. Each day's violation is a separate offense.

Acts 1972, ch. 641, § 14; T.C.A., § 65-3014; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.